Massachusetts, session 194th, S2062.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 38A of Chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
the following:-
"The commissioner shall promulgate regulations to reclassify inventory reporting and
assessment procedures conducted by natural gas transportation corporations or limited liability
companies in municipalities that contain a natural gas compressor station. Any such regulations
shall require assessments to differentiate the value for allocation between pipelines and
compressor station equipment, provided that any value assessed on compressor station
equipment be allocated to a municipality. The portion of the value assessed on compressor
station equipment shall be allocated to a municipality based on the municipality’s respective
percentage of the gross investment for compressor station equipment. The commissioner shall
of 2

prescribe a manner for the allocations and expenditures of the funds that are received by a
municipality containing a compressor station pursuant to this section. The commissioner shall
promulgate all regulations and guidelines established in this section no later than December 31,
2026."
of 2